District of Columbia statutes.
26-908

Fees allowed on foreclosure.

In any foreclosure on any loan made under this chapter no charges for attorneys’ or agents’ fees shall be made or collected which will exceed 10% of the amount found due in such foreclosure proceedings.

Feb. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 660, ch. 26, § 8
1981 Ed., § 26-708.
1973 Ed., § 26-608.